Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2122
Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards; powers.

The Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards may make occasional random checks of county and municipal construction projects to determine that the standards of design and construction developed under section 39-2113 are being met.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 22, p. 1128;

Laws 1971, LB 100, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 12.